District of Columbia statutes.
16-1909

Construction of chapter.

This chapter does not affect any provision of chapter 153 of Title 28, United States Code.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 585, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Cross References

Juvenile curfew, parenting classes, see § 2-1543.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1909.
1973 Ed., § 16-1909.